District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “African American Civil War Museum Limited Grant-Making Authority
Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 2032 of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168;
D.C. Code § 1-328.04), is amended by adding a new subsection (kk) to read as follows:
“(kk) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor may make a
grant in Fiscal Year 2025 or 2026 to the African American Civil War Memorial Freedom
Foundation, Inc. for the purpose of redeveloping the African American Civil War Museum,
located at 1925 Vermont Avenue, NW.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2